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DTC P0753/62,P0758/63 Shift Solenoid A/B Electrical Malfunc-
tion(No. 1/No.2Solenoidvalve)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Shifting from 1st toO/D isperformed incombinationwithONandOFFof theNo. 1 andNo.2solenoidvalves
controlledbyEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)orECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE). If anopen
orshort circuit occurs ineitherof thesolenoidvalves, theEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)orECT
ECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE)controls the remainingnormalsolenoidvalve toallow thevehicle tobeoper-
ated smoothly (Fail safe function).
HINT:
Check theNo. 1 solenoidvalvewhenDTCP0753/62 isoutput, check theNo.2solenoidvalvewhenDTC
P0758/63 is output.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0753/62
P0758/63

The Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU checks for an open or
short circuit in theNo. 1 orNo.2solenoidvalvecircuitwhen it
changes.
The Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU records DTC
P0753/62 or P0758/63 if condition (a) or (b) is detected once,
but it does not light up O/D OFF indicator light.
After Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU detects condition (a)
or (b)continuously8 timesormore in 1 trip, it causes theO/D
OFF indicator light lightsupuntil condition (a)or (b)disap-
pears.
After that, if theEngineandECTECUorECTECUdetects
condition (a) or (b) once, it starts lighting up O/D OFF indicator
light again.

(a)Solenoid resistance is8 � or less (short circuit)when the
solenoid is energized.
(b)Solenoid resistance is 100k � ormore (opencircuit)when
the solenoid is not energized.

SOpenorshort inNo. 1/No.2solenoidvalvecircuit
SNo.1/No.2solenoidvalve

SEngineandECTECU(2UZ −FE, 1FZ−FE)
SECTECU( 1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE)

Fail Safe Function:
If either of the shift solenoid valve circuits develops an open or short, the Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU
turns the other solenoid valve ON and OFF to shift to the gear positions shown in the table below. The Engine
and ECT ECU or ECT ECU also turns the SL solenoid valve OFF at the same time. If both solenoids are
malfunctioning, hydraulic control cannot be performed electronically and must be done manually.
Manual shifting as shown in the following table must be done (In the case of a short circuit, the Engine and
ECT ECU or ECT ECU stops sending current to the short circuited solenoid).

DI3R5−01



Range
NORMAL

NO.1 SOLENOID
MALFUNCTIONING

Solenoid valve
No.1 No.2

Gear

NO.2 SOLENOID
MALFUNCTIONING

BOTH SOLENOIDS MAL-
FUNCTIONING

Solenoid valve
No.1 No.2

Gear Solenoid valve
No.1 No.2

Gear
Gear when shift selector is
manuallyoperated

D

2

L

ON

ON

OFF

ON

ONOFF
OFFOFF

ON

ON

OFF

ON

ONOFF

ON

ONON

OFF

1st

2nd

3rd

O/D

1st

2nd

3rd

1st

2nd

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

ON

ON

OFF

OFF

ON

ON

ON

3rd

3rd

O/D

3rd

3rd

1st

2nd

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

X

ON

ON

OFF

OFF

OFF

ON

ON

1st

1st

O/D

O/D

3rd

1st

1st

O/D

O/D

O/D

O/D

3rd

3rd

3rd

1st

1st

X: Malfunctions

OFF 3rd

3rd

OFF

O/D

3rd

OFF

OFF

D03393

2UZ−FE

Transmission

S1 SolenoidValve
W

4

S2SolenoidValve
Y

E1

8

R
8

EB2
1

R
E9

Engine and ECT ECU

S1

W
E1

9
EB2 W E9

2
S2

−DIAGNOSTICS AUTOMATICTRANSMISSION(A442F)
DI−127

LANDCRUISER(W/G) (RM6 16E)

WIRING DIAGRAM



D03965
D03966 D03978

1FZ−FE

1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Measure resistance between terminal S1 or S2 of Engine and ECT ECU or ECT
ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO−1 27).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU or

ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal S1 or S2 of Engine and
ECT ECU or ECT ECU and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU or
ECT ECU (See page IN−35).

NG
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2 Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU and
automatic transmission solenoid connector.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the solenoid connector from the automatic trans-
mission.
CHECK:
Check the harness and connector between terminal S1 or, S2
of Engine and ECT ECU or ECT ECU and terminal S1 or S2 of
solenoid connector.
OK:

There is no open and no short circuit.
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NG Repair or replace the harness or connector.

OK

3 Check No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.

Electrical Check:
PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.
(d) Remove the No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.
CHECK:
(a) Measure resistance between solenoid connector and

body ground.
(b) Connect positive lead to terminal of solenoid connec-

tor, negative lead to solenoid body.
OK:

(a) Resistance: 11 − 15 � at 20 ˚C (68 ˚F)
(b) The solenoid makes an operating noise.

Mechanical Check:
PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.
(d) Remove the No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.
CHECK:
(a) Applying 490 kPa (5 kgf/cm2, 71 psi) of compressed air,

check that the solenoid valves do not leak air.
(b) When battery positive voltage is supplied to the solenoid

valves, check that the solenoid valves open.
OK:

(a) Solenoid valve does not leak air.
(b) Solenoid valve opens.

NG Replace the solenoid valve.

OK

Repair or replace the solenoid wire.


